ro_RO.dic
abordez/B
abstrag/EH
abțin/EH
academizez/B
achiesez/B
aclimatizez/B
acroșez/B
acutizez/B
adjectivizez/B
admit/EH
aduc/EH
adun/B
afinez/B
agiotez/B
agresionez/B
ajung/EH
alambichez/B
aleg/EH
alertez/B
alimentez/B
amalgamez/B
ambardez/B
ameliorez/B
amortizez/B
analizez/B
anclanșez/B
anesteziez/B
animalizez/B
antepun/EH
antifonez/B
anulez/B
aparțin/EH
apostrofez/B
aprind/EH
aproximez/B
apun/EH
ard/EH
arestez/B
aridizez/B
arondez/B
ascensionez/B
ascund/EH
asibilez/B
astenizez/B
ating/EH
atomizez/B
atrag/EH
autoaccidentez/B
autocitez/B
autodiagnostichez/B
autodistrug/EH
autografiez/B
autolimitez/B
autopropulsez/B
autoutilez/B
avertizez/B
azurez/B
aștern/EH
baladez/B
balonez/B
barbarizez/B
bazez/B
bifez/B
bivuachez/B
blazonez/B
bolboșez/B
bordez/B
braconez/B
brichetez/B
brumez/B
buciumez/B
butaforizez/B
cabotez/B
calchiez/B
caligrafiez/B
campez/B
canotez/B
caponez/B
caramelizez/B
carnavalizez/B
casez/B
cateterizez/B
cazez/B
centrifughez/B
cern/EH
chimiosterilizez/B
ciclizez/B
citadinizez/B
clasicizez/B
clonez/B
coafez/B
cocârjez/B
colectivizez/B
colportez/B
comisionez/B
comit/EH
compilez/B
compoundez/B
compun/EH
concatenez/B
concep/EH
concretizez/B
conduc/EH
conexez/B
conflictualizez/B
congratulez/B
consonantizez/B
constrâng/EH
containerizez/B
contraargumentez/B
contrapun/EH
contrasemnez/B
contrazic/EH
convenționalizez/B
converg/EH
conving/EH
conțin/EH
cooperez/B
coregrafiez/B
corespund/EH
cosemnez/B
cramponez/B
crestez/B
cromatizez/B
crăcănez/B
culeg/EH
culminez/B
cuprind/EH
curbez/B
curg/EH
cădelnițez/B
cășunez/B
datez/B
debenzolez/B
debreiez/B
debutanizez/B
decalcifiez/B
decarbonatez/B
decelez/B
decid/EH
declanșez/B
decofrez/B
decomentez/B
deconectez/B
decontez/B
decrementez/B
decuplez/B
decurg/EH
deduc/EH
deetatizez/B
deferizez/B
deflorez/B
degajez/B
degomez/B
degurgitez/B
delaborez/B
delineez/B
demantelez/B
demilitarizez/B
demit/EH
demobilizez/B
demontez/B
denaționalizez/B
denuclearizez/B
depavez/B
depind/EH
deplafonez/B
deplâng/EH
depolitizez/B
depravez/B
deprind/EH
depropanizez/B
depun/EH
derutez/B
deschid/EH
descind/EH
descing/E
descompun/EH
desconcentrez/B
desertizez/B
desocializez/B
desprind/EH
destinez/B
detectez/B
devinez/B
dezafectez/B
dezasortez/B
dezeuropenizez/B
dezic/EH
dezinteresez/B
dezorientez/B
dețin/EH
diafanizez/B
difractez/B
dinamizez/B
discern/EH
disjung/E
disponibilizez/B
dispun/EH
disting/EH
distrag/EH
distrug/EH
domiciliez/B
dreg/EH
dubitez/B
duc/EH
ecarisez/B
edentez/B
elansez/B
eludez/B
emerg/EH
emit/EH
epatez/B
escaladez/B
etapizez/B
eutanasiez/B
examinez/B
exclud/EH
exilez/B
explicitez/B
expun/EH
extrapolez/B
faliez/B
fațetez/B
ființez/B
firez/B
flexibilizez/B
formatez/B
francizez/B
frig/EH
frustrez/B
frâng/EH
fug/E
galopez/B
gestionez/B
girez/B
gofrez/B
greblez/B
guineez/B
hectopiez/B
hiperbolizez/B
idolatrizez/B
imersez/B
impresionez/B
impun/EH
includ/EH
incriminez/B
indispun/EH
induc/EH
infectez/B
inflig/E
injuriez/B
instaurez/B
interiorizez/B
interpun/EH
interzic/EH
intonez/B
introduc/EH
iotacizez/B
itinerez/B
juxtapun/EH
labializez/B
legalizez/B
libidinez/B
ling/EH
literarizez/B
lubrifiez/B
magnetizez/B
manifestez/B
maruflez/B
maturez/B
melancolizez/B
mențin/EH
merg/E
metabolizez/B
militarizez/B
mitraliez/B
moldovenizez/B
monopolizez/B
mulez/B
mulg/EH
naturalizez/B
neutralizez/B
ning/EH
normez/B
obstaculez/B
obțin/EH
oftez/B
omit/EH
optez/B
opun/EH
ospitaliez/B
paliez/B
paralelizez/B
parcurg/EH
parodiez/B
patetizez/B
pendulez/B
percep/EH
perfectizez/B
permit/EH
perseverez/B
petrec/EH
pilonez/B
pitulez/B
plastografiez/B
plâng/EH
policarbonez/B
portez/B
preavizez/B
predispun/EH
preling/EH
preludez/B
presupun/EH
pretez/B
pretind/EH
prezic/EH
pricep/EH
prind/EH
problematizez/B
produc/EH
proletarizez/B
promit/EH
propun/EH
prozaizez/B
pun/EH
păduchez/B
pătrund/EH
radiografiez/B
rag/EH
raportez/B
reaudiez/B
reconfortez/B
reflotez/B
regresez/B
relaxez/B
reordonanțez/B
reprogramez/B
resping/EH
retratez/B
reîmbărbătez/B
ridiculizez/B
romanizez/B
rup/EH
rusticizez/B
râd/EH
rămân/E
răpun/EH
răsfrâng/EH
răspund/EH
răsînțeleg/EH
sacralizez/B
saramurez/B
schematizez/B
scot/EH
scurg/EH
scălâmbăiez/B
seduc/EH
selecționez/B
serigrafiez/B
siliconizez/B
sinizez/B
smulg/EH
sofistichez/B
sortez/B
sprintez/B
spun/EH
stereotipez/B
strechez/B
strâng/EH
străpung/EH
subdivizez/B
subjug/EH
subtitrez/B
sug/EH
sumarizez/B
supraestimez/B
supraproduc/EH
suprapun/EH
supun/EH
surdinizez/B
sustrag/EH
susțin/EH
săgetez/B
tanchez/B
taxez/B
televizez/B
termosterilizez/B
titularizez/B
tractez/B
traduc/EH
trag/EH
transliterez/B
transmit/EH
transpun/EH
trec/EH
trefilez/B
trimit/EH
truchez/B
tușez/B
ung/EH
unicizez/B
utilizez/B
vaticinez/B
vibrez/B
vitrifiez/B
votez/B
zic/EH
zinchez/B
îmbălsămez/B
împing/EH
împopoțonez/B
împung/EH
înamorez/B
încep/EH
închid/EH
încifrez/B
încing/EH
încovoiez/B
încârlionțez/B
îndoliez/B
înfig/EH
înflăcărez/B
înfrâng/EH
îngrețoșez/B
înmatriculez/B
înrămez/B
înstrăinez/B
întind/EH
înting/EH
întrec/EH
întrerup/EH
întrețin/EH
întristez/B
înving/EH
învârstez/B
înțeleg/EH
șablonizez/B
șemizez/B
șterg/EH
șutez/B
țes/EH
țin/EH
